Utah statutes.
53A-11-1304.   Admissibility of evidence in civil and criminal actions.

(1)  Evidence relating to violations of this part which is seized by school authorities acting alone, on their own authority, and not in conjunction with or at the behest of law enforcement authorities is admissible in civil and criminal actions.

(2)  A search under this section must be based on at least a reasonable belief that the search will turn up evidence of a violation of this part.  The measures adopted for the search must be reasonably related to the objectives of the search and not excessively intrusive in light of the circumstances, including the age and sex of the person involved and the nature of the infraction.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

